test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-poous_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - põõus a-stem huuli: # Noun - full paradigm
     põõus+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: põõus
     põõus+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: põhssâm
     põõus+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: põhssâm
     põõus+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: põhssma
     põõus+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: põhssmest
     põõus+N+Sg+Com+Indef: põhssmin
     põõus+N+Ess+Indef: põõusen
     põõus+N+Par+Indef: põõused
     põõus+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [põhssâmtaa, põhssâmtää]
     põõus+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: põhssâm
     põõus+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: põhssmi
     põõus+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: põhssmid
     põõus+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: põhssmid
     põõus+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: põhssmin
     põõus+N+Pl+Com+Indef: põhssmivuiʹm
     põõus+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [põhssmitaa, põhssmitää]
